Maryland, session 2026, SB0126.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–137.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0126*

SENATE BILL 126
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “ELIGIBLE STUDENT” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 11–608 OF
THE LABOR AND EMPLOYMENT ARTICLE.
(3) “PROGRAM” MEANS THE SUMMER ACADEMY FOR MATHEMATICS
AND SERVICE PILOT PROGRAM ESTABLISHED UNDER § 11–608 OF THE LABOR AND
EMPLOYMENT ARTICLE.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY IN CHARLES COUNTY.
(C) (1) IN PARTNERSHIP WITH THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF LABOR,
THE CHARLES COUNTY PUBLIC SCHOOL SYSTEM SHALL IMPLEMENT THE PROGRAM
TO PROVIDE TARGETED INSTRUCTION IN A 6–WEEK COURSE OFFERED DURING
SUMMER BREAK TO ELIGIBLE STUDENTS WHO ARE NOT PROFICIENT IN ALGEBRA OR
GEOMETRY.
(2) IN IMPLEMENTING THE PROGRAM UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION, THE CHARLES COUNTY PUBLIC SCHOOL SYSTEM SHALL:
(I) USE EVIDENCE–BASED MATHEMATICS INTERVENTIONS
AND ADAPTIVE LEARNING TECHNOLOGY;
(II) OFFER TRANSPORTATION CONSISTENT WITH
TRANSPORTATION AID GUIDELINES; AND
(III) OFFER MEAL ACCESS CONSISTENT WITH THE MARYLAND
MEALS FOR ACHIEVEMENT PROGRAM.
(D) THE CHARLES COUNTY PUBLIC SCHOOL SYSTEM MAY PARTNER WITH:
(1) COMMUNITY COLLEGES OR UNIVERSITIES WITH TEACHER
PREPARATION PROGRAMS;
(2) PUBLIC LIBRARIES;
(3) STEM LEARNING CENTERS; OR
(4) NONPROFIT OR COMMUNITY–BASED ORGANIZATIONS WITH
DEMONSTRATED SUCCESS IN ACADEMIC TUTORING OR MATHEMATICS
ENRICHMENT.

SENATE BILL 126 3
(E) ON OR BEFORE SEPTEMBER 30 EACH YEAR, THE CHARLES COUNTY
PUBLIC SCHOOL SYSTEM SHALL REPORT TO THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF
LABOR ON:
(1) THE NUMBER OF STUDENTS SUPPORTED BY THE PROGRAM;
(2) STUDENT ATTENDANCE AND COMPLETION RATES OF THE
PROGRAM;
(3) PROFICIENCY LEVELS IN MATHEMATICS BEFORE AND AFTER
PARTICIPATION IN THE PROGRAM; AND
(4) THE EFFECTIVENESS OF INTERVENTIONS USED IN THE
PROGRAM.
Article – Labor and Employment
11–608.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “ELIGIBLE STUDENT” MEANS A STUDENT IN GRADES 9 THROUGH
11 WHO:
(I) SCORED BELOW A PROFICIENT LEVEL ON THE MOST
RECENT STATE ASSESSMENT IN MATHEMATICS; OR
(II) ATTENDS A PUBLIC SCHOOL IN WHICH FEWER THAN 90% OF
STUDENTS ACHIEVED A PROFICIENT LEVEL IN MATHEMATICS AS DETERMINED BY
THE MOST RECENT STATE ASSESSMENT.
(3) “PROGRAM” MEANS THE SUMMER ACADEMY FOR MATHEMATICS
AND SERVICE PILOT PROGRAM.
(B) THERE IS A SUMMER ACADEMY FOR MATHEMATICS AND SERVICE
PILOT PROGRAM WITHIN THE DEPARTMENT.
(C) THE PURPOSE OF THE PROGRAM IS TO PROVIDE MATHEMATICS
INSTRUCTION TO ELIGIBLE STUDENTS IN THE CHARLES COUNTY PUBLIC SCHOOL
SYSTEM TO MITIGATE THE EFFECTS OF LEARNING LOSS AND PROMOTE STUDENT
ACCELERATION.

SENATE BILL 126
(D) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(1) DEVELOP AND ISSUE STANDARDS FOR THE PROGRAM,
INCLUDING:
(I) MINIMUM INSTRUCTIONAL HOURS;
(II) CURRICULUM ALIGNMENT WITH STATE STANDARDS; AND
(III) TEACHER QUALIFICATIONS;
(2) ESTABLISH PERFORMANCE INDICATORS TO EVALUATE PROGRAM
EFFECTIVENESS;
(3) PROVIDE TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE TO THE CHARLES COUNTY
PUBLIC SCHOOL SYSTEM; AND
(4) AWARD GRANTS TO THE CHARLES COUNTY PUBLIC SCHOOL
SYSTEM FOR PROGRAM OPERATION.
(E) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PRIORITIZE THE USE OF AVAILABLE
FUNDING FOR THE PROGRAM.
(2) FUNDS SHALL BE DISTRIBUTED TO THE CHARLES COUNTY
PUBLIC SCHOOL SYSTEM BASED ON THE NUMBER OF ELIGIBLE STUDENTS.
(3) FUNDS MAY BE USED FOR:
(I) TEACHER STIPENDS;
(II) INSTRUCTIONAL MATERIALS AND TECHNOLOGY; AND
(III) PROGRAM EVALUATION AND DATA COLLECTION.
(F) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL COMPILE AND PUBLISH A SUMMARY OF THE
INFORMATION REPORTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 7–137 OF THE EDUCATION
ARTICLE, INCLUDING:
(1) AGGREGATED AND DISAGGREGATED DATA BY GRADE LEVEL,
SCHOOL, AND DEMOGRAPHIC SUBGROUP;
(2) TRENDS IN MATHEMATICS PROFICIENCY; AND

SENATE BILL 126 5
(3) RECOMMENDATIONS FOR PROGRAM PARTICIPATION AND
RESOURCE ALLOCATION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026. It shall remain effective for a period of 14 years and, at the end of
September 30, 2040, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly,
shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.